src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! The Tokelauan morphophonological/twolc rules file !
!! =================================== !

Alphabet !!= # @CODE@
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z   !!= - @CODE@ = lower case
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z   !!= - @CODE@ = upper case
 %^R:f %^R:g %^R:k %^R:l %^R:m %^R:n %^R:p %^R:h %^R:t %^R:v  !!= - @CODE@ = redup Cns
 %^R1:f %^R1:g %^R1:k %^R1:l %^R1:m %^R1:n %^R1:p %^R1:h %^R1:t %^R1:v  !!= - @CODE@ = tja
 %^R2:f %^R2:g %^R2:k %^R2:l %^R2:m %^R2:n %^R2:p %^R2:h %^R2:t %^R2:v  !!= - @CODE@ = tja
 %^E:a %^E:e %^E:i %^E:o %^E:u   !!= - @CODE@  !!= - @CODE@ = redup Vow
 %^E1:a %^E1:e %^E1:i %^E1:o %^E1:u   !!= - @CODE@ = tja
 %^E2:a %^E2:e %^E2:i %^E2:o %^E2:u   !!= - @CODE@ = tja
 %^3S:0  !!= - @CODE@ 
 %^VC:0
 %^T:t %^A:a !!= @CODE@ = ta prefix
 %^%[:0 %^%]:0
 %>:0   !!= - @CODE@ = suffix border
 a2 e2 i2 o2 u2 ;  !!= - @CODE@ for Petele2ema - Peteleema *Petelēma
                   !! The digit 2 to be removed in longvowel-cleanup.regex 
Sets !!= # @CODE@ 

 Vow = a e i o u     !!= - @CODE@ 
       ā ē ō ī ū Ā Ē Ō Ī Ū ; !!≈ - @CODE@ long vowels  
 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z ;  !!= - @CODE@ 
 
Rules !!= # @CODE@ 

"Vow shortening"
Vx:0 <=> Vx _ %^VC: ;
	where Vx in Vow ;

!## CV reduplication

"^R realisation as consonant"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = duplicates C for reduplication
%^R:Cx <=> .#.                 _ %^E: %> Cx ;
           .#. %^3S: (Cns) Vow _ %^E:    Cx ;
     where Cx in Cns ;
! REnofo -> nonofo
! REtuu -> tutuu

"^E realisation as vowel"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = duplicates V for reduplication
%^E:Vx <=> .#.                 %^R: _ %> (Cns) Vx ;
           .#. %^3S: (Cns) Vow %^R: _    (Cns) Vx ;
       where Vx in Vow ;


!## CVCV reduplication

"^R1 realisation as consonant"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = duplicates C1 for full reduplication
%^R1:Cx <=>  _ %^E1: %^R2: %^E2: %> Cx ;
     where Cx in Cns ;

"^E1 realisation as vowel"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = duplicates V1 for full reduplication
%^E1:Vx <=>  _ %^R2: %^E2: %> (Cns) Vx ;
       where Vx in Vow ;

"^R2 realisation as consonant"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = duplicates C3 for full reduplication
!%^R2:Cx <=> .#. %^R1: %^E1: _ %^E2: %> (Cns) (Vow) Cx;
%^R2:Cx <=>  _ %^E2: %> (Cns) Vow Cx ;
     where Cx in Cns ;

"^E2 realisation as vowel"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@** = duplicates V2 for full reduplication
!%^E2:Vx <=> .#. %^R1: %^E1: %^R2: _ %> (Cns) (Vow) (Cns) Vx ;
%^E2:Vx <=>  _ %> (Cns) Vow Cns Vx ;
       where Vx in Vow ;


"^R as zero"
%^R:0 <=> .#. (Cns) Vow _ ;

"^E as zero"
%^E:0 <=> .#. (Cns) Vow %^R: _ ;


"Deletion in front of ^T"
Cx:0 <=> %^T: %^A: _ ;
	where Cx in Cns ;
	
"Deletion in front of ^A"
Vx:0 <=> %^T: %^A: Cns: _ ;
	where Vx in Vow ;
	
